Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska46-1616
Engineer, defined.

Engineer means a professional engineer licensed under the Engineers and Architects Regulation Act who (1) is competent in areas related to dam investigation, design, construction, and operation for the type of dam being investigated, designed, constructed, or operated, (2) has at least four years of relevant experience in investigation, design, construction, reconstruction, enlargement, alteration, breach, removal, or abandonment of dams, and (3) understands adverse consequences and dam failures.

Laws 2005, LB 335, § 16.

Engineers and Architects Regulation Act, see section 81-3401.